foma/sakha.lexc
!!!sakha.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols GUESS+ ^TESTGUESS ^NOUNGUESS ^VERBGUESS +pos +N +deriv +ag +dim1 +dim2 +dim3 +dim4 +dim5 +nmlz +instr.nom +nmlz2 +nmlz3 +dvb +dvb2 +ag.nom +num +sg +pl +case +nom +acc +part +dat +abl +ins +com +cmpr +poss +1sg +2sg +3sg .poss3sg. +1pl +2pl +3pl .lar. +gen +vblz +vblz4 +vblz2 +vblz3 .drv.vblz3. +vblz5 +vblz6 +vblz7 +V +tense +pres .tns.pres. +polarity +neg +impf +pst.narr +pst.res1 +fut .tns.fut. .tns.fut.neg. +ptcp.pres +advlz +ADV +ptcp.pst +ptcp.fut +mood +epist +ptcp.epist +con2 +deont +ptcp.deont +pst.epsd +ptcp.epsd +fut.deont +usual +ptcp.ag.usual +pst +cvb.ant .cvb.ant. +cvb.ant/sim +cvb.sim .cvb.sim. +cvb.purp .cvb.purp. +cvb.immed.ant .cvb.immed. +attd +pers +1 .1sg. +2 .2sg. +3 .3sg. .1pl. .2pl. .3pl. +deadj



LEXICON Root

N ;
V ;
TEST ;

LEXICON TEST

ба TESTstem;
бабай TESTstem;
GUESS+^TESTGUESS:0^TESTGUESS TESTstem;

LEXICON TESTstem
+deriv:^ка #;
+deriv2:^га #;
+deriv3:^бай TESTstem;

LEXICON N
GUESS+^NOUNGUESS:0^NOUNGUESS Nstem;
таба Nstem;
балык Nstem;
лекарство:эмп Nstem;
байхал Nstem;
сурук Nstem;
баай Nstem;
орон Nstem;

LEXICON V
GUESS+^VERBGUESS:0^VERBGUESS Vstem;
бар Vstem;


LEXICON Nstem

+pos+N:^ Ninfl;
+pos+N:^ NsourceDerivation;


LEXICON NsourceDerivation

NNaffix ;
Vaffix ;
NVaffix ;
NominalVaffix ;

LEXICON NNaffix

+deriv+ag:һыт^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim1:чык^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim2:ка^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim3:чаан^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim4:кай^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dim5:ыйа^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz:был^ Ninfl;
+deriv+instr.nom:ах^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz2:лаҥ^ Ninfl;
+deriv+nmlz3:лта^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VNaffix

+deriv+dvb:ыы^ Ninfl;
+deriv+dvb2:һын^ Ninfl;
+deriv+ag.nom:ааччы^ Ninfl;


LEXICON Ninfl

+num+sg:0 Ncase;
+num+sg:0 NPoss;
+num+pl:лар^ Ncase;
+num+pl:лар^ NPoss;


LEXICON Ncase

+case+nom:0 #;
+case+acc:ы^ #;
+case+part:та^ #;
+case+dat:га^ #;
+case+abl:тан^ #;
+case+ins:нан^ #;
+case+com:лыын^ #;
+case+cmpr:тааҕар^ #;


LEXICON NPoss

NPossNom ;
NPossAcc ;
NPossPart ;


LEXICON NPossNom

+case+nom+poss+1sg:м^ #;
+case+nom+poss+2sg:ҥ^ #;
+case+nom+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.а^ #;
+case+nom+poss+1pl:быт^ #;
+case+nom+poss+2pl:гыт^ #;
+case+nom+poss+3pl:.lar.лара^ #;


LEXICON NPossGen

+case+gen+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ын^ #;
+case+gen+poss+3pl:.lar.ларын^ #;


LEXICON NPossAcc

+case+acc+poss+1sg:бын^ #;
+case+acc+poss+2sg:ҕын^ #;
+case+acc+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ын^ #;
+case+acc+poss+1pl:бытын^ #;
+case+acc+poss+2pl:ҕытын^ #;
+case+acc+poss+3pl:.lar.ларын^ #;


LEXICON NPossPart

+case+acc+poss+1sg:бына^ #;
+case+part+poss+2sg:ҕына^ #;
+case+part+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ына^ #;
+case+part+poss+1pl:бытына^ #;
+case+part+poss+2pl:ҕытына^ #;
+case+part+poss+3pl:.lar.ларына^ #;


LEXICON NPossDat

+case+dat+poss+1sg:бар^ #;
+case+dat+poss+2sg:ҕар^ #;
+case+dat+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ыгар^ #;
+case+dat+poss+1pl:бытыгар^ #;
+case+dat+poss+2pl:ҕытыгар^ #;
+case+dat+poss+3pl:.lar.ларыгар^ #;


LEXICON NPossAbl

+case+abl+poss+1sg:быттан^ #;
+case+abl+poss+2sg:ҕыттан^ #;
+case+abl+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ыттан^ #;
+case+abl+poss+1pl:бытыттан^ #;
+case+abl+poss+2pl:ҕытыттан^ #;
+case+abl+poss+3pl:.lar.ларыттан^ #;


LEXICON NPossIns

+case+ins+poss+1sg:бынан^ #;
+case+ins+poss+2sg:ҕынан^ #;
+case+ins+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ынан^ #;
+case+ins+poss+1pl:бытынан^ #;
+case+ins+poss+2pl:ҕытынан^ #;
+case+ins+poss+3pl:.lar.ларынан^ #;


LEXICON NPossCom

+case+com+poss+1sg:быныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+1sg:бынаан^ #;
+case+com+poss+2sg:ҕыныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+2sg:ҕынаан^ #;
+case+com+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ыныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ынаан^ #;
+case+com+poss+1pl:бытыныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+1pl:бытынаан^ #;
+case+com+poss+2pl:ҕытыныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+2pl:ҕытынаан^ #;
+case+com+poss+3pl:.lar.ларыныын^ #;
+case+com+poss+3pl:.lar.ларынаан^ #;


LEXICON NPossCmpr

+case+cmpr+poss+1sg:бынааҕар^ #;
+case+cmpr+poss+2sg:ҕынааҕар^ #;
+case+cmpr+poss+3sg:.poss3sg.ынааҕар^ #;
+case+cmpr+poss+1pl:бытынааҕар^ #;
+case+cmpr+poss+2pl:ҕытынааҕар^ #;
+case+cmpr+poss+3pl:.lar.ларынааҕар^ #;


LEXICON Vaffix

+deriv+vblz:лаа Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:тый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:сый Vstem;


LEXICON NVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;


LEXICON AdjVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;


LEXICON NominalVaffix

+deriv+vblz2:й Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.ыр Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.ар Vstem;
+deriv+vblz3:.drv.vblz3.аар Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:тый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz4:сый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz5:мсый Vstem;
+deriv+vblz6:рҕаа Vstem;
+deriv+vblz7:рый Vstem;


LEXICON Vstem

+pos+V:^ Vinfl;
+pos+V:^ VsourceDerivation;


LEXICON Vinfl

Vindic ;
Vepist ;
Vcond2 ;
Vdeont ;
Vagent ;


LEXICON Vindic

VindicTenses ;
VindicPtcp ;
Vcvb ;


LEXICON VindicTenses

Vpres ;
Vimpf ;
Vfut ;
Vpst ;
VpstNarr ;
VpstRes1 ;
VpstEpisodic ;


LEXICON VindicPtcp

VptcpPres ;
VptcpPast ;
VptcpFut ;
VptcpEpisodic ;


LEXICON Vcvb

VcvbAnt ;
VcvbNeg ;
VcvbSim ;
VcvbPurp ;
VcvbImmedAnt ;


LEXICON Vepist

VepistMood ;
VptcpEpist ;


LEXICON Vdeont

VpresDeont ;
VptcpDeont ;
VfutDeont ;
VptcpFutDeont ;


LEXICON Vagent

VagentMood ;
VagentPtcp ;


LEXICON Vpres

+tense+pres:.tns.pres.ар^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+pres+polarity+neg:бат^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON Vimpf

+tense+impf:ар^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+impf+polarity+neg:бат^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VpstNarr

+tense+pst.narr:быт^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+pst.narr+polarity+neg:батах^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VpstRes1

+tense+pst.res1:быт^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+pst.res1+polarity+neg:батах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON Vfut

+tense+fut:.tns.fut.ыах^ VpossNumPers;
+tense+fut+polarity+neg:.tns.fut.neg.ыах^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpPres

+ptcp.pres:.tns.pres.ар^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.pres:.tns.pres.ар^ PtcpPresSourceDeriv;
+ptcp.pres+polarity+neg:бат^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.pres+polarity+neg:бат^ PtcpPresSourceDeriv;


LEXICON PtcpPresSourceDeriv

+deriv+advlz+pos+ADV:лыы^ #;


LEXICON VptcpPast

+ptcp.pst:быт^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.pst:быт^ PtcpPstSourceDeriv;
+ptcp.pst+polarity+neg:батах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.pst+polarity+neg:батах^ PtcpPstSourceDeriv;


LEXICON PtcpPstSourceDeriv

+deriv+advlz+pos+ADV:лыы^ #;
+deriv+advlz+pos+ADV:ча^ #;


LEXICON VptcpFut

+ptcp.fut:.tns.fut.ыах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.fut:.tns.fut.ыах^ PtcpFutSourceDeriv;
+ptcp.fut+polarity+neg:.tns.fut.neg.ыах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.fut+polarity+neg:.tns.fut.neg.ыах^ PtcpFutSourceDeriv;


LEXICON PtcpFutSourceDeriv

+deriv+advlz+pos+ADV:лыы^ #;
+deriv+advlz+pos+ADV:лык^ #;


LEXICON VepistMood

+mood+epist:тах^ VpossNumPers;
+mood+epist+polarity+neg:батах^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpEpist

+ptcp.epist:тах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.epist:тах^ VpredNumPers;
+ptcp.epist+polarity+neg:батах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.epist+polarity+neg:батах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON Vcond2

+mood+con2:тах^ VLocPredNumPers;
+mood+con2+polarity+neg:батах^ VLocPredNumPers;


LEXICON VpresDeont

+mood+deont:ардаах^ VpredNumPers;
+mood+deont+polarity+neg:баттаах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpDeont

+ptcp.deont:ардаах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.deont+polarity+neg:баттаах^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VpstEpisodic

+tense+pst.epsd:быттаах^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+pst.epsd+polarity+neg:батахтаах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpEpisodic

+ptcp.epsd:быттаах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.epsd+polarity+neg:батахтаах^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VfutDeont

+tense+fut.deont:ыахтаах^ VpredNumPers;
+tense+fut.deont+polarity+neg:ымыахтаах^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VptcpFutDeont

+ptcp.deont:ыахтаах^ Ninfl;
+ptcp.deont+polarity+neg:ымыахтаах^ Ninfl;


LEXICON VagentMood

+mood+usual:ааччы^ VpredNumPers;
+mood+usual+polarity+neg:ааччы^ VpossNumPers;


LEXICON VagentPtcp

+ptcp.ag.usual:ааччы^ Ninfl;


LEXICON Vpst

+tense+pst:л^ VpossNumPersPLlar;
+tense+pst+polarity+neg:бат^ VpossNumPersPLlar;


LEXICON VcvbAnt

+cvb.ant:.cvb.ant.н^ #;
+cvb.ant:.cvb.ant.н^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VcvbNeg

+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:бакка^ #;
+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:бакка^ VpredNumPers;
+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:ымна^ #;
+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:ымна^ VpredNumPers;
+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:ымайа^ #;
+cvb.ant/sim+polarity+neg:ымайа^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VcvbSim

+cvb.sim:.cvb.sim.а^ #;
+cvb.sim:.cvb.sim.а^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VcvbPurp

+cvb.purp:.cvb.purp.аары^ #;
+cvb.purp:.cvb.purp.аары^ VpredNumPers;
+cvb.purp+polarity+neg:ымаары^ #;
+cvb.purp+polarity+neg:ымаары^ VpredNumPers;


LEXICON VcvbImmedAnt

+cvb.immed.ant:.cvb.immed.аат^ #;
+cvb.immed.ant:.cvb.immed.аат^ NPossAcc;


LEXICON VsourceDerivation

VVaffix ;
VNaffix ;


LEXICON VVaffix

+deriv+attd:аахтаа^ Vinfl;


LEXICON VpossNumPers

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.м^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҥ^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.а^ #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.быт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕыт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.лара^ #;


LEXICON VpossNumPersPLlar

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.м^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҥ^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.а^ #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.быт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕыт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.лар^ #;


LEXICON VpredNumPers

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.бын^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҕын^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.0 #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.быт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕыт^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.лар^ #;


LEXICON VLocPredNumPers

+num+sg+pers+1:.1sg.бына^ #;
+num+sg+pers+2:.2sg.ҕына^ #;
+num+sg+pers+3:.3sg.ына^ #;
+num+pl+pers+1:.1pl.бытына^ #;
+num+pl+pers+2:.2pl.ҕытына^ #;
+num+pl+pers+3:.3pl.тарына^ #;



LEXICON AdjSourceDerivation

+deriv+deadj:лык^ AdvStem;


LEXICON NumStem

NumInfl ;
NumSourceDerivation ;


LEXICON NumSourceDerivation

Vaffix ;


LEXICON PronStem

PronInfl ;
PronSourceDerivation ;


LEXICON PronSourceDerivation

Vaffix ;
